Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4830.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 72. (1) As soon as practicable after the filing of a petition, the commissioner authorized to act on the petition, if not disqualified under section 381 to make the apportionment of benefits, may appoint a board of determination composed of 3 disinterested property owners. If the commissioner is disqualified or chooses not to appoint the board of determination, the commissioner shall immediately file a copy of the petition with the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, together with a statement, signed by the commissioner, that he or she is disqualified or chooses not to act in appointing appoint a board of determination. As soon as practicable after receiving a copy of the petition and certificate, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, unless he or she has a conflict of interest, shall appoint a board of determination composed of 3 disinterested property owners. and The chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall immediately notify the drain commissioner of the names and addresses of those appointed. If the chairperson of the county board of commissioners has a conflict of interest, in the proceedings, the drain committee of the county board of commissioners shall appoint the board of determination. Members of boards the board of determination shall be residents of the county but not of a township, city, or village affected by the drain, and shall not be members of the county board of commissioners. of the county. (2) The drain commissioner shall call a meeting of the board of determination at a convenient place within the drainage district or at a public building within a city, village, or township in which the drain is located. If an individual appointed to the board of determination fails or refuses to serve, the drain commissioner shall appoint a successor. The per diem drain commissioner shall determine reasonable compensation for and the mileage and expense reimbursements approve necessary expenses of a member of the board of determination shall be the same as the county board of commissioners of the county. In counties where commissioners are not paid on a per diem basis, the compensation and the mileage and expense reimbursements shall be set by the drain commissioner. for each meeting attended. Upon request, the county drain commissioner shall inform in writing the requesting state legislator who represents the area in which the proposed drain improvement is to be constructed of the names and addresses of the persons appointed to a board of determination. (3) The drain commissioner shall give public notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting of the board of determination in the manner required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. The commissioner shall also give such notice, not less than 10 days before the meeting, by all of the following means: (a) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. (b) Service on the county clerk and a member of the board of county road commissioners of the county and on the supervisor of each township and clerk of each city and village in the drainage district, personally or by certified mail. (c) Service by first-class mail on each person whose name appears on the last city, village, or township tax roll as owning land within the drainage district, at the address shown on the roll. If an a person's address does not appear on the roll, a notice need not be mailed to the person. The drain commissioner shall make state in an affidavit of the mailing and shall recite in the affidavit that the notice was mailed to all of the persons whose names and addresses appear upon the tax rolls as owning land within the drainage district. The affidavit is conclusive proof that notice was mailed to each person to whom notice is required to be mailed under this section. The failure to receive a notice by mail is not a jurisdictional defect invalidating a drain proceeding or drain assessment if notice was sent by first class mail as provided in this subdivision. (4) All expenses of notification under this section shall be paid by the drainage district when created. (5) At the time and place specified in the notice, the board of determination shall meet, elect a chairperson and secretary, and, after considering the evidence offered, determine the necessity of the proposed drain and whether the proposed drain is necessary and conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare. The board of determination , if it considers it necessary, shall may require the county drain commissioner to obtain from the county treasurer a statement showing the amount of taxes and special assessments levied against the land in the proposed drainage district on the tax rolls for the immediately preceding 3 years and the amount of the taxes and assessments remaining unpaid. If it appears from the statement indicates that 25% or more of the taxes are unpaid on the lands, further action shall not be taken on the petition. If the board of determination finds, by a majority vote of the members, that the drain is not necessary and conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare, the board of determination shall file with the commissioner an order dismissing the petition, and a further another petition for the drain shall not be filed within 1 year after the determination. If the board of determination finds, by a majority vote of the members, that the proposed drain is necessary and conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare, the board of determination shall make an order to that effect and file the order with the commissioner. Not more than 10 days after the board of determination files an order finding the proposed drain to be necessary and conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare, the drain commissioner shall determine the cities, townships, and villages within the drainage district benefiting at large from the drain for public health and shall notify each such city, township, and village that it is liable to pay a percent of the cost of construction of the drain by reason of benefits at large for public health. Within 20 days after the commissioner's receipt of the order of the board of determination, if an appeal has not been taken under section 72a, the drain commissioner shall make a first order of determination in writing. , giving The order shall set forth the name or number of the drainage district and a general description of the route, terminus, and type of construction of the drain. The drain commissioner shall file a copy of the order in his or her office. Sec. 384. The salary drain commissioner shall determine reasonable compensation for and approve necessary expenses of the a commissioner so appointed , which shall be the same as that received by him from the county of which he is commissioner, together with all expenses actually and necessarily incurred by him, shall be under this chapter for each meeting attended. These amounts shall be assessed against the drain in connection with for which said the services were performed and shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses are paid. Sec. 441. (1) Two or more drainage districts located in the same county and in the same drainage basin or in adjoining basins, may, consolidate and organize in whole or part, be consolidated and organized as a single drainage district upon the filing of a petition for consolidation with the drain commissioner of the county setting forth the reason for the proposed consolidation. The consolidation may include land not within an existing drainage district if requested in the petition. The petition shall be signed by at least 50 property owners within the proposed consolidated drainage district. If in However, if for the proposed consolidated drainage district there are less than 100 property owners, the petition shall be signed by at least 50% of the property owners in the proposed consolidated drainage district. In place of a petition Instead of being signed by property owners, a petition may be signed solely by a city, village, or township a portion all or part of which is located within the proposed consolidated drainage district, when if authorized by its governing body, or by a combination of such municipalities. (2) As soon as practicable after the filing of a petition, the drain commissioner, if not disqualified under section 381, may appoint a board of determination composed of 3 disinterested property owners to determine the necessity of the consolidation. If the commissioner is disqualified or chooses not to appoint the board of determination, the commissioner shall immediately file a copy of the petition with the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, together with a statement signed by the commissioner showing that he or she is disqualified or chooses not to act in appointing appoint a board of determination. Upon As soon as practicable after receiving a copy of the petition and certificate, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, if not privately interested, unless he or she has a conflict of interest, shall appoint as soon as practicable a board of determination. and The chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall immediately notify the drain commissioner of the names and addresses of those appointed. If the chairperson of the county board of commissioners has a private interest in the proceedings, conflict of interest, the drain committee of the county board of commissioners shall appoint the board of determination. Members of a board of determination shall be residents of the county but not of the proposed consolidated drainage district or of a drainage district a part of which is to be included in the proposed consolidation. A The drain commissioner shall call a meeting of the board of determination shall be called at a convenient place within the proposed consolidated drainage district. at some convenient place to be designated by the drain commissioner. If a person appointed to the board of determination fails or refuses to serve, a successor shall be appointed by the official or committee making the appointment in the first instance. The drain commissioner shall determine reasonable compensation for and approve necessary expenses of a member of the board of determination shall be $8.00 per day with no additional allowance for mileage. The county board of commissioners of a county may increase the per diem compensation of members of the board of determination.for each meeting attended. (3) (2) The drain commissioner shall give notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting of the board of determination in the manner prescribed by Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976 and by required by the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. The drain commissioner shall also give such notice as provided in all of the following: (a) By publication twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed consolidated drainage district. , the The first publication of which shall be at least 10 days before the meeting. Notices shall also be served on (b) To the county clerk and to the clerk supervisor of each township and the clerk of each village or city in the proposed consolidated drainage district, personally or by registered mail at least 10 days before the meeting. The drain commissioner shall also send notice by (c) By first-class mail of the time, date, and place of the meeting at least 10 days before the date of the meeting to each person whose name appears on the last city, village, or township tax assessment roll as owning land within any of the existing drainage districts , a portion of which is proposed to be consolidated, or owning lands or within the proposed consolidated drainage district, whose land is not within an existing drainage district, at the address shown on the roll. If an a person's address does not appear on the roll, then a notice need not be mailed to those persons. the person. The drain commissioner shall make state in an affidavit of the mailing, and shall recite in the affidavit that the persons to whom is conclusive proof, that the notice was mailed constitute all of the persons to whom notice must be sent. The affidavit shall be conclusive proof that notice was mailed to each person to whom notice is required to be mailed by this section. The failure to receive a notice by mail shall not constitute is not a jurisdictional defect invalidating a drain proceeding if notice has been sent by first-class mail as provided in this section. subdivision. (4) All expense of notification under this section shall be paid by the drainage district when created. (5) (3) At the time and place fixed specified in the notice, the board of determination shall meet, elect a chairperson and a secretary, and, proceed to after considering the evidence offered, determine whether the proposed consolidation is conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare. After hearing the evidence, the board shall make its determination as to whether the proposed consolidation is conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare. If the board finds by a majority vote of the members that the proposed consolidation is not conducive to public health, convenience, or welfare, it the board of determination shall file with the commissioner an order dismissing the petition, and a further another petition for the drain shall not be entertained filed within 1 year after the determination. If the board by a majority vote of the members finds that the proposed consolidation is conducive to the public health, convenience, or welfare, it shall make its prepare an order to that effect and file the order with the commissioner. Upon receipt of the order of consolidation, the commissioner shall enter an order giving the consolidated drainage district a name or number. Sec. 464. (1) A drainage board is created for each project petitioned for under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection subsections (2) and (4), the drainage board shall consist of the drain commissioner of the county, the chairperson of the county board of commissioners, and the chairperson of the board of county auditors. (2) If there is no board of county auditors in the county, then the chairperson of the finance committee of the county board of commissioners shall be a member of the drainage board. If there is neither a board of county auditors nor a finance committee, then the chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall select from time to time 1 member of the county board of commissioners to be a member of the drainage board. If a member of the drainage board who is a member of the county board of commissioners, as provided in this section or section 487, is interested in a project petitioned for under this chapter, by reason of his or her holding holds an elected or appointed office in a public corporation to be assessed for the cost of the a project petitioned for under this chapter, he or she is disqualified to act as a member of the drainage board with respect to the project. In that case, the vice-chairperson or chairperson pro tempore of the county board of commissioners or of the finance committee of the county board of commissioners, if not also so disqualified, shall act as the member. If the vice-chairperson or chairperson pro tempore is disqualified, the drain commissioner of the county shall designate a member of the county board of commissioners who is not so disqualified to act as a member of the drainage board for the project. (3) The drainage board shall determine reasonable compensation for and approve necessary expenses of the chairperson of the county board of commissioners and any member of a county board of commissioners serving on the drainage board shall receive the compensation, mileage, and expenses as provided by the drainage board. However, compensation paid to a member shall not exceed $25.00 per diem, exclusive of mileage and expenses, for attendance at drainage board meetings. for each meeting attended. The county drain commissioner shall be chairperson of the drainage board. The chairperson shall keep minutes of the proceedings of the drainage board and maintain all records and files of the drainage board shall be kept in his or her office. In counties of less than 500,000 population, the commissioner shall be paid the same compensation as other members of the drainage board. (4) (2) If a county is organized under a charter adopted under 1966 PA 293, MCL 45.501 to 45.521, and the charter prescribes an elected county executive, the drainage board shall consist of the following members: (a) The person designated by the charter to carry out the administrative duties of the drain commissioner or that person's designee, who shall also serve as chairperson of the drainage board. (b) The county commissioner whose district will be assessed for the greatest portion of the cost of the project, or that county commissioner's designee. The determination of which county commissioner is qualified to sit under this subdivision shall initially be made by the chairperson of the drainage board when the petition for the project is filed. After the final order of apportionment is issued under section 469, the county commissioner who qualifies under this section shall become the county commissioner member and serve until another apportionment is established requiring the seating of another commissioner. (c) A person appointed by the county executive with the advice and consent of a majority of the members of the county board of commissioners elected or appointed and serving. (5) (3) In a county described in subsection (2), (4), the requirements in this chapter for substantive actions and determinations shall be followed in administering each project petitioned for under this chapter, subject to and in accordance with any applicable provisions of the county charter. Sec. 515. (1) There is created for For each project petitioned for under the provisions of this chapter, an augmented drainage board to consist is created. Except as provided in subsection (2), the augmented drainage board consists of the members of the drainage board together with the chairman chairperson of the county board of supervisors commissioners and the chairman chairperson of the board of county auditors of each county involved. (2) If there is no board of county auditors in any a county, then the chairman chairperson of the finance committee of the county board of supervisors commissioners shall act as a member of the augmented drainage board, and if there is neither a board of county auditors nor a finance committee, then the chairman chairperson of the county board of supervisors commissioners shall select 1 member of the county board of supervisors commissioners of his the county to act as a member of the augmented drainage board. (3) The chairman chairperson and secretary of the drainage board shall act as chairman chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the augmented drainage board. (4) The chairman augmented drainage board shall determine reasonable compensation for and approve necessary expenses of the chairperson of the county board of supervisors commissioners and any other member of a county board of supervisors commissioners serving on the augmented drainage board, shall receive such compensation, mileage and expenses as shall be provided by the augmented drainage board except that such compensation shall not exceed $25.00 per diem exclusive of mileage and expenses for attendance at augmented drainage board meetings.for each meeting attended.